ko: 코일 유형: 세라믹; 클랩튼; 메시; 일반; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de bobina: Cerâmica; Clapton; Mesh; Regular; Outros
sv: Fjädertyp: Keramik; Clapton; Mesh; Standard; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ vinutia: Keramická; Clapton; Mesh; Štandardná; Iné
fi: Lämmitysvastuksen tyyppi: Keraaminen; Clapton; Mesh; Tavallinen; Muu
th: ประเภทคอยล์: เซรามิก; แคลปตัน; ตาข่าย; แบบธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ cívky: Keramická; Clapton; Síťka (mesh); Běžná; Jiná
tr: Bobin türü: Seramik; Clapton; Mesh; Normal; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta tuljave: Keramična; Clapton; Mrežasta; Navadna; Drugo
zh-TW: 線圈類型: 陶瓷; 克萊普頓線圈 (Clapton coil); 網狀; 一般; 其他
el: Τύπος πηνίου: Κεραμικό; Clapton; Mesh; Κανονικό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul bobinei: Ceramică; Clapton; Mesh; Obișnuită; Altele
da: Fjedertype: Keramisk; Clapton; Mesh; Almindelig; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta zavojnice: Keramika; Clapton; Mrežica; Obična; Ostalo
nb: Spoletype: Keramisk; Clapton; Mesh; Vanlig; Annet
ru: Тип спирали: Керамическая; Клэптон (Clapton); Сетка (Mesh); Обычная; Другое
vi: Loại lò xo: Gốm; Clapton; Lưới; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
lt-LT: Ritės tipas: Keraminis; „Clapton“; Tinklelinis („Mesh“); Įprastas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип спирала: Керамична; Клептън; Мрежеста; Обикновена; Други
en: Coil type: Ceramic; Clapton; Mesh; Regular; Other
nl: Coil type: Keramisch; Clapton; Mesh; Regulier; Overig
it: Tipo di bobina: Ceramica; Clapton; Mesh; Regolare; Altro
hu: Tekercs típusa: Kerámia; Clapton; Mesh; Normál; Egyéb
zh-CN: 线圈类型: 陶瓷; 克莱普顿; 网状; 常规; 其他
fr: Type de bobine: Céramique; Clapton; Mesh; Standard; Autre
es: Tipo de resistencia: De cerámica; Clapton; De malla; Regular; Otro
pl: Typ grzałki: Ceramiczna; Clapton; Siatkowa (mesh); Zwykła; Inna
ja: コイルタイプ: セラミック; クラプトン; メッシュ; レギュラー; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de bobina: Cerâmica; Clapton; Malha; Normal; Outro
de: Typ der Spule: Keramik; Clapton; Mesh; Standard; Andere